Tennessee, session 114, HB0770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-113(a)(7)(A), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(iii) Notwithstanding chapter 7 of this title and to the extent permissible under
federal law, the maximum gross vehicle weight of a vehicle with an axle group of three
(3) axles (tridem) is eighty-five thousand pounds (85,000 lbs.);
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-113(a)(7), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(M) If an operator is assessed an additional tax on each pound of weight for
which no Tennessee tax has been previously paid, then such additional tax must be paid
to the department within ninety (90) days of being assessed.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-7-203(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(10) Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(3) and to the extent permissible under
federal law, the total gross vehicle weight of a vehicle with an axle group of three (3)
axles (tridem) over, on, or upon the public highways of this state must not exceed eighty-
five thousand pounds (85,000 lbs.).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0770
002948
- 1 -